test/src/morphology/V-tulwma79_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - tulõma: # Verb (79) tulõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tulõma+V+Inf/mA: tulõma
     tulõma+V+Inf: tullaq
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: tulõ
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: [tulõt, tulõdõq]
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: tulõ
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: tulõ
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: tulõmiq
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [tulõtiq, tulõt, tulõdõq]
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: tulõvaq
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prs+Sc+ConNeg: [tulõ, tulõ-õiq, tulõq]
#     ???tulõma+V+Ind+Prs+OcSg3: tuldas
#     ???tulõma+V+Ind+Prs+Oc+ConNeg: [tulda, tulda-aiq, tuldaq]
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: tulli
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: [tulliq, tullit, tullidõq]
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: tullʼ
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [tullimiq, tulli]
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [tullitiq, tulliq, tullit, tullidõq]
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: [tulliq, tullivaq]
     tulõma+V+Ind+Prt+Sc+ConNeg: [tulõ, tulõ-õs, tulõq]

     tulõma+V+ActPrsPrc+A+Sg+Nom: tullõv
     tulõma+V+ActPrsPrc+A+Sg+Gen: tulõva
     tulõma+V+ActPrsPrc+A+Sg+Par: tulõvat
     tulõma+V+ActPrsPrc+A+Sg+Ill: tulõvahe
     tulõma+V+ActPrsPrc+A+Pl+Nom: tulõvaq
     tulõma+V+ActPrsPrc+A+Pl+Gen: tulõvidõ
     tulõma+V+ActPrsPrc+A+Pl+Par: tulõvit
     tulõma+V+ActPrsPrc+A+Pl+Ill: tulõvihe
                    
     tulõma+V+ActPrtPrc: tulnuq

     tulõma+V+ActPrtPrc+A+Sg+Nom: tulnuq
     tulõma+V+ActPrtPrc+A+Sg+Gen: tulnuq
     tulõma+V+ActPrtPrc+A+Sg+Par: tulnut
     tulõma+V+ActPrtPrc+A+Sg+Ill: tulnuhe
     tulõma+V+ActPrtPrc+A+Pl+Nom: tulnuq
     tulõma+V+ActPrtPrc+A+Pl+Gen: [tulnuidõ, tulnuisi]
     tulõma+V+ActPrtPrc+A+Pl+Par: [tulnuid, tulnuisi]
     tulõma+V+ActPrtPrc+A+Pl+Ill: [tulnuihe, tulnuisihe]
